Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 11. Prohibited Acts

§ 791.
Penalty.

A person who conducts field investigation activities on or under any land owned or controlled by the State or within the boundaries of any designated State archaeological landmark, without first obtaining a permit therefor from the State Historic Preservation Officer or any person who appropriates, defaces, destroys, or otherwise alters any archaeological site or specimen located on or under State lands or within the boundaries of a designated State archaeological landmark, except in the course of activities pursued under the authority of a permit granted by the State Historic Preservation Officer, shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months or both, and in addition, shall forfeit to the State all specimens, objects, and materials collected or excavated, together with all photographs and records relating to that material.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 109

, § 4; amended

2001, No. 35

, § 7.